Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 4 Business Corporations — Officers, Directors, and Stockholders

7-4-1, 7-4-2.
[Repealed.]

7-4-3.
Voting on stock held by fiduciaries and pledgees.

A person holding stock in a fiduciary capacity is entitled to vote the stock. In the case of stock held jointly by two (2) or more executors, administrators, guardians, conservators, trustees, or other fiduciaries, the fiduciaries may designate, in writing, one or more of their number to represent the stock and vote it, unless there is a provision to the contrary in any instrument defining their powers and duties. A person whose stock is pledged is entitled to vote the stock until the stock is transferred on the books of the corporation to the pledgee, and subsequently the pledgee is entitled to vote the stock.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1925, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 248, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 116, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

7-4-3

.

7-4-4 — 7-4-14.
[Repealed.]

7-4-15.
Rights and liabilities surviving death of officer, director, or stockholder.

Except as otherwise provided in the general corporation law, any right of action against any officer, director, or stockholder of a corporation arising from any liability or penalty created or imposed by the provisions of the general corporation law survives the death of the person; and the right of contribution provided by this chapter exists in favor of the estate of the officer, director, or stockholder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1925, § 46; G.L. 1923, ch. 248, § 46; G.L. 1938, ch. 116, § 46; G.L. 1956, §

7-4-15

.

7-4-16.
Survival of suits against officers, directors, and stockholders.

No suit against any officer, director, or stockholder for any liability or penalty created or imposed by the provisions of the general corporation law abates by reason of his or her death, but his or her estate is liable in the hands of his or her executor or administrator, who may voluntarily appear or may be summoned by the plaintiff to defend the suit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1925, § 47; G.L. 1923, ch. 248, § 47; G.L. 1938, ch. 116, § 47; G.L. 1956, §

7-4-16

.

7-4-17 — 7-4-19.
[Repealed.]